Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.580

Electric vehicle service provider penalties.

(1) An electric vehicle service provider that fails to meet the requirements established under RCW 19.94.560 through 19.94.570, or any rule adopted pursuant to the authority granted to the department under RCW 19.94.560 through 19.94.570, is subject to a civil penalty of $200 per electric vehicle supply equipment for the first violation and $500 per electric vehicle supply equipment for each subsequent violation within one year of the first violation.

(2) Moneys collected under this section must first be used to cover the department's costs to enforce this section. Any remaining moneys must be deposited into the electric vehicle account created in RCW 82.44.200.

[ 2021 c 238 s 11.]